Udmurt.aff
SFX g Y 337 		# для одушевленных
SFX g 0 э [дзлнсту]  #ед.ч.
SFX g 0 е [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь е ь
SFX g й е й
SFX g 0 эд [дзлнсту] 
SFX g 0 ед [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь ед ь
SFX g й ед й 
SFX g 0 эз [дзлнсту]  
SFX g 0 ез [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь ез ь
SFX g й ез й
SFX g 0 мы .
SFX g 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX g 0 мес . 
SFX g 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX g 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX g 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX g 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX g 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX g 0 элэн [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эдлэн [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эзлэн [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 елэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 едлэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 езлэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь елэн ь
SFX g й елэн й
SFX g ь едлэн ь
SFX g й едлэн й
SFX g ь езлэн ь
SFX g й езлэн й
SFX g 0 мылэн .
SFX g 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX g 0 элэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эдлэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эзлэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 елэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 едлэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 езлэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь елэсь ь
SFX g й елэсь й
SFX g ь едлэсь ь
SFX g й едлэсь й
SFX g ь езлэсь ь
SFX g й езлэсь й
SFX g 0 мылэсь .
SFX g 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX g 0 элы [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эдлы [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эзлы [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 елы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 едлы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 езлы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь елы ь
SFX g й елы й
SFX g ь едлы ь
SFX g й едлы й
SFX g ь езлы ь
SFX g й езлы й
SFX g 0 мылы .
SFX g 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX g 0 этэк [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эдтэк [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эзтэк [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 етэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 едтэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 езтэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь етэк ь
SFX g й етэк й
SFX g ь едтэк ь
SFX g й едтэк й
SFX g ь езтэк ь
SFX g й езтэк й
SFX g 0 мытэк .
SFX g 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX g 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX g 0 эя [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эдъя [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эзъя [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 ея [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 едъя [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g 0 езъя [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX g ь ея ь
SFX g й ея й
SFX g ь едъя ь
SFX g й едъя й
SFX g ь езъя ь
SFX g й езъя й
SFX g 0 мыя .
SFX g 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX g 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX g 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX g 0 эн [дзлнсту] #твор.п.
SFX g 0 ен [^дзлнстуь]
SFX g ь ен ь
SFX g й ен й
SFX g 0 эным [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эныд [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эныз [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 еным [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 еныд [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 еныз [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 энымы [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 эныды [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 энызы [дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 енымы [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 еныды [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 енызы [^дзлнсту]
SFX g 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX g 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX g 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX g 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX g 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX g 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX g 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX g 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
